Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-605
Defeated candidate;
prohibited acts; exception.

No candidate defeated
at a primary election shall be permitted to file an affidavit declaring a
write-in candidacy, file by petition, or file a nomination, if nominated by
party convention or committee, for the following general election for the
same office except as provided in section 32-615, 32-616, or 32-625.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 173;

Laws 2002, LB 251, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB144, § 1.

A candidate for nomination for the office of Governor, who is defeated at the primary election, is not eligible to be a candidate by petition for the office of United States Senator at the following election. State ex rel. O'Sullivan v. Swanson, 127 Neb. 806, 257 N.W. 255 (1934).

A candidate for the nomination for the office of Secretary of State, who is defeated in the primary election is not eligible to be a candidate by petition for the office of Auditor of Public Accounts at the following general election. State ex rel. Driscoll v. Swanson, 127 Neb. 715, 256 N.W. 872 (1934).